Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2114
Actions; statute of limitations.

An action under the Consumer Rental Purchase Agreement Act may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction within one year of the date of the occurrence of any violation or within six months of the time the consumer rental purchase agreement and any renewal or extension of the agreement cease to be in effect, whichever occurs later. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, an action under the act may be maintained by way of recoupment or counterclaim in an action brought against the consumer by the lessor or the lessor's assignee.

Laws 1989, LB 681, § 14.